Utah statutes.
31A-21-107.   Contract rights under noncomplying policies.

(1)  Except as otherwise specifically provided by this title, a policy is enforceable against the insurer according to its terms, even if it exceeds the authority of the insurer.

(2)  Any insurance policy, rider, or endorsement issued after July 1, 1986, and which is otherwise valid, which contains any condition or provision not in compliance with the requirements of this title, is not rendered invalid by this title.   However, those conditions and provisions shall be construed and applied as if the policy, rider, or endorsement was in full compliance with this title.

(3)  Upon written request of the policyholder or an insured whose rights under the policy are continuing and not transitory, an insurer shall reform and reissue or amend by a clearly stated rider its written policy to comply with the requirements of the law existing at the date of issuance of the policy.  Subject to this section and Section 31A-21-102, a person seeking to reform a written insurance agreement by complaint or petition to a judicial authority shall show by clear and convincing evidence the existence of facts establishing the reformation.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

